en/technical.aff
# Technical terms dictionary affix file
# Universal technical terms applicable to all languages

SET UTF-8

# Suffix for plural
# Handles standard English plural rules
SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

# Suffix for possessive
SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0     's         .
